Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1405.
Powers and duties of Director.

The Director, under the direction and control of the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as are conferred or imposed upon him by law and shall perform any other duties required of him by the Governor or the Board.

In addition to the other responsibilities set forth herein, the Director shall carry out management and supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the regulations and policies of the Board. In no event shall the Director have the authority to promulgate any final regulation.The Director shall be vested with all the authority of the Board when it is not in session, subject to such regulations as may be prescribed by the Board.

The Director shall serve as the liaison with the United States Department of Energy on matters concerning the siting of high-level radioactive waste repositories, pursuant to the terms of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982.

The Director shall obtain a criminal records check pursuant to §

19.2-389

of key personnel listed in the disclosure statement when the Director determines, in his sole discretion, that such a records check will serve the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-269; 1988, c. 891; 1990, c. 919; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsection A.

§ 10.1-1406.
Exemptions from liability; expedited settlements.

No person shall be liable under the provisions of subdivision 19 of §

10.1-1402

for cleanup or to reimburse the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund if he can establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation and the damages resulting therefrom were caused solely by:

An act of God;

An act of war;

An act or omission of a third party other than an employee or agent of the defendant, or other than one whose act or omission occurs in connection with a contractual relationship, existing directly or indirectly, with the defendant (except where the sole contractual arrangement arises from a published tariff and acceptance for carriage by a common carrier by rail), if the defendant establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) he exercised due care with respect to the hazardous waste or hazardous substance concerned, taking into consideration the characteristics of such hazardous waste or hazardous substance, in light of all relevant facts and circumstances and (ii) he took precautions against foreseeable acts or omissions of any such third party and the consequences that could foreseeably result from such acts or omissions; or

Any combination of subdivisions 1 through 3 of this section. For purposes of this section, the term “contractual arrangement” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C. § 9601(35).

The Board may, consistent with programs developed under the federal acts, expedite a determination to limit the liability of innocent landowners, de minimis contributors or others who have grounds to claim limited responsibility for a containment or cleanup which may be required pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 566, § 10-270; 1988, cc. 627, 891; 1990, cc. 472, 919; 1991, c. 718; 1999, c. 798.

The 1999 amendment

inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1406.1.
Access to abandoned waste sites.

For the purposes of this section, “abandoned waste site” means a waste site for which (i) there has not been adequate remediation or closure as required by Chapter 14 (§

10.1-1400

et seq.) of this title, (ii) adequate financial assurances as required by §

10.1-1410

or §

10.1-1428

are not provided, and (iii) the owner, operator, or other person responsible for the cost of cleanup or remediation under state or federal law or regulation cannot be located.

Any local government or agency of the Commonwealth may apply to the appropriate circuit court for access to an abandoned waste site in order to investigate contamination, to abate any hazard caused by the improper management of substances within the jurisdiction of the Board, or to remediate the site. The petition shall include (i) a demonstration that all reasonable efforts have been made to locate the owner, operator or other responsible party and (ii) a plan approved by the Director and which is consistent with applicable state and federal laws and regulations. The approval or disapproval of a plan shall not be considered a case decision as defined by § 2.2-4001.

Any person, local government, or agency of the Commonwealth not otherwise liable under federal or state law or regulation who performs any investigative, abatement or remediation activities pursuant to this section shall not become subject to civil enforcement or remediation action under this chapter or other applicable state laws or to private civil suits related to contamination not caused by its investigative, abatement or remediation activities.

This section shall not in any way limit the authority of the Board, Director, or Department otherwise created by Chapter 14 of this title.

History.

1996, c. 547.

§ 10.1-1406.2.
Conditional exemption for coal and mineral mining overburden or solid waste.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to coal or mineral mining overburden returned to the mine site or solid wastes from the extraction, beneficiation, and processing of coal or minerals that are managed in accordance with requirements promulgated by the Department of Energy.

History.

1999, cc. 584, 613, 947; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1407.
Repealed by Acts 1988, cc. 696, 891.

§ 10.1-1407.1.
Notification of local government of violation.

Upon determining that there has been a violation of a regulation promulgated under this chapter and such violation poses an imminent threat to the health, safety or welfare of the public, the Director shall immediately notify the chief administrative officer of any potentially affected local government. Neither the Director, the Commonwealth, nor any employee of the Commonwealth shall be liable for a failure to provide, or a delay in providing, the notification required by this section.

History.

1988, cc. 434, 891.